District of Columbia statutes.
16-1057

Immunity.

(a)

Any health-care provider or any other person or institution providing information to the Board pursuant to this subchapter shall have immunity from liability, administrative, civil, or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the disclosure of information.

(b)

If acting in good faith, without malice, and within the parameters of the protocols established by this subchapter, representatives of the Board are immune from civil liability for an activity related to reviews of domestic violence fatalities.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320

History